Illinois, session 104th, SB651.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Public Library District Act of 1991 is 5amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (75 ILCS 16/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Public Library District Act of 1991.9(Source: P.A. 87-1277.)